District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.04

Definitions.

For purposes of §§ 1-612.04 through 1-612.10, the term:

(1)

“Agency” shall have the meaning provided in § 1-603.01(1).

(2)

“Employee” shall have the meaning provided in § 1-603.01(7), except that it shall mean only an employee who is eligible to accrue annual leave.

(3)

“Leave donor” means an employee who donates annual leave to the annual leave bank created in accordance with § 1-612.05.

(4)

“Leave recipient” means an employee whose personnel authority has approved the employee’s application to receive annual leave from the annual leave bank.

(5)

“Medical emergency” means a medical condition of an employee or a member of an employee’s family that is likely to require the employee’s absence from duty for a prolonged period of time and to result in a substantial loss of income to the employee because of the unavailability of paid leave.

(6)

“Personnel authority” shall have the meaning provided in § 1-603.01(14).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1204
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-155, § 2, 37 DCR 4159
1981 Ed., § 1-613.4.
This section is referenced in § 1-612.11.